Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.060

Bond election.

Upon presentation of the petition, the county legislative authority may submit to the voters of the county at the next general election the question of issuing bonds and levying a tax for such hospital.

[ 1984 c 26 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.060. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 174 s 4; RRS s 6090-4.]